Wisconsin, session 2025, SB501.
do enact as follows:SB501,11Section 1. 39.389 of the statutes is created to read:SB501,2,3239.389 Veterinary loan repayment grant program. (1) Definitions. In 3this section:SB501,2,54(a) “Eligible applicant” means an individual to whom, at the time of 5application for the grant program, any of the following applies:SB501,2,861. The individual is enrolled in an accredited school of veterinary medicine 7and has completed sufficient credits in a program leading to the degree of doctor of 8veterinary medicine to be in the final year of the program.SB501,2,1192. The individual was awarded the degree of doctor of veterinary medicine 10from an accredited school of veterinary medicine within the immediately preceding 117-year period.SB501,2,1312(b) “Farm animal” means any warm-blooded animal normally raised on farms 13in the United States and used or intended for use as food or fiber.SB501,3,21(c) “Grant program” means the veterinary loan repayment grant program 2under this section.SB501,3,33(d) “Rural county” has the meaning given in s. 39.399 (1g) (a).SB501,3,44(e) “Veterinarian” has the meaning given in s. 89.02 (7).SB501,3,95(2) Establishment of program. There is established, to be administered by 6the board, a veterinary loan repayment grant program to provide financial 7assistance to veterinarians employed in rural counties in repaying educational loan 8obligations incurred to become qualified to practice veterinary medicine in this 9state.SB501,3,1210(3) Grant awards. (a) Subject to pars. (b) and (c) and sub. (4), the board may 11award grants under this section to eligible applicants if all of the following apply at 12the time the grant is awarded:SB501,3,15131. The eligible applicant has an outstanding balance of at least $25,000 in 14educational debt incurred in connection with pursuing or obtaining the degree of 15doctor of veterinary medicine.SB501,3,17162. The eligible applicant has secured or committed to secure full-time 17employment as a veterinarian for at least one year in a rural county.SB501,3,1918(b) Subject to sub. (4), the total amount of a grant awarded under this section 19may not exceed the lesser of the following:SB501,3,22201. The total outstanding balance of the educational debt that the eligible 21applicant incurred in connection with pursuing or obtaining the degree of doctor of 22veterinary medicine.SB501,4,2232. For each year that the eligible applicant has secured or committed to secure 1full-time employment as a veterinarian in a rural county, $25,000, but not 2exceeding a total grant award of $100,000.SB501,4,53(c) Grants awarded under this section may be used only to repay educational 4debt incurred in connection with pursuing or obtaining the degree of doctor of 5veterinary medicine.SB501,4,106(4) Grant payments. The board shall pay grant awards annually until the 7total amount of the grant awarded under sub. (3) (b) has been paid, with no annual 8payment exceeding $25,000. The board may not make an annual payment of a 9grant award unless the eligible applicant has satisfied all of the following 10requirements:SB501,4,1211(a) The eligible applicant completed the year of full-time employment as a 12veterinarian in a rural county.SB501,4,1413(b) During the year described in par. (a), the eligible applicant provided at 14least 25 percent of his or her employed veterinary care to farm animals.SB501,215Section 2. 71.05 (6) (b) 58. of the statutes is created to read:SB501,4,181671.05 (6) (b) 58. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, any 17amount received by an individual, in the taxable year to which the subtraction 18relates, from the veterinary loan repayment grant program under s. 39.389.SB501,319Section 3. Initial applicability.SB501,4,2120(1) Veterinary loan repayment grant program. This act first applies to 21an individual who graduates from a school of veterinary medicine in 2025.SB501,4,2222